California statutes. Probate Code
 court pursuant to this section is confidential. The report may be considered by the court and shall be made available only to the persons who have been served in the proceeding and the persons who have appeared in the proceeding or their attorneys. The report may be received in evidence upon stipulation of counsel for all of those persons who are present at the hearing or, if a person is present at the hearing but is not represented by counsel, upon consent of that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 612, Sec. 59.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Termination [1600. - 1602.]

1600.

(a) A guardianship of the person or estate or both terminates when the ward attains majority unless, pursuant to Section 1510.1, the ward requests the extension of, or consents to the extension of, the guardianship of the person until the ward attains 21 years of age.

(b) A guardianship of the person terminates upon the death of the ward, the adoption of the ward, or upon the emancipation of the ward under Section 7002 of the Family Code.

(c) A guardianship of the estate terminates upon the death of the ward, except as provided by
 Section 2467 and Article 4 (commencing with Section 2630) of Chapter 7 of Part 4, and except as otherwise provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 73, Sec. 1.   (AB 2113)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1601.

Upon petition of the guardian, a parent, the minor ward, or, in the case of an Indian child custody proceeding, an Indian custodian or the ward’s tribe, the court may make an order terminating the guardianship if the court determines that it is in the ward’s best interest to terminate the guardianship. Upon petition of a ward who is 18
 years of age or older, the court shall make an order terminating the guardianship. Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 694, Sec. 5.   (AB 900)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1602.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that guardians perform a critical and important role in the lives of minors, frequently assuming a parental role and caring for a child when the child’s parent or parents are unable or unwilling to do so.

(b) Upon making a determination that a guardianship should be terminated pursuant to Section 1601, the court may consider whether continued visitation between the ward and the guardian is in the ward’s best interest. As part of the order of termination, the court shall have jurisdiction to issue an order providing for ongoing visitation between a former guardian and his or her former minor ward after the termination of the guardianship. The order granting or denying visitation may not be modified unless the court determines, based upon evidence presented, that there has been a significant change of circumstances since the court issued the order and that modification of the order is in the best interest of the child.

(c) A copy of the visitation order shall be filed in any court proceeding relating to custody of the minor. If a prior order has not been filed, and a proceeding is not pending relating to the custody of the minor in the court of any county, the visitation order may be used as the sole basis for opening a file in the court of the county in which the custodial parent resides. While a parent of the child has custody of the child, proceedings for modification of the visitation order shall be determined in a proceeding under the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 301, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Permanent and Stable Home [1610. - 1611.]

1610.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the best interests of children to be raised in a permanent, safe, stable, and loving environment.

(b) Unwarranted petitions, applications, or motions other than discovery motions after the guardianship has been established create an environment that can be harmful to children and are inconsistent with the goals of permanency, safety, and stability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 493, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1611.

If a person files a petition for visitation, termination of the guardianship, or instruction to the guardian that is unmeritorious, or intended to harass or annoy the guardian, and the person has previously filed pleadings in the guardianship proceedings that were unmeritorious, or intended to harass or annoy the guardian, this petition shall be grounds for the court to determine that the person is a vexatious litigant for the purposes of Title 3a (commencing with Section 391) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. For these purposes, the term “new litigation” shall include petitions for visitation, termination of the guardianship, or instruction to the guardian.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1118, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. CONSERVATORSHIP [1800. - 2033.]



  CHAPTER 1. Establishment of Conservatorship [1800. - 1849.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. Persons for Whom Conservator May Be Appointed [1800. - 1804.]

1800.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to do the following:

(a) Protect the rights of persons who are placed under conservatorship.

(b) Provide that an assessment of the needs of the person is performed in order to determine the appropriateness and extent of a conservatorship and to set goals for increasing the conservatee’s functional abilities to whatever extent possible.

(c) Provide that the health and psychosocial needs of the proposed conservatee are met.

(d) Provide that community-based services are used to the greatest extent in
 order to allow the conservatee to remain as independent and in the least restrictive setting as possible.

(e) Provide that the periodic review of the conservatorship by the court investigator shall consider the best interests and expressed wishes of the conservatee; whether the conservatee has regained or could regain abilities and capacity with or without supports; and whether the conservatee continues to need a conservatorship.

(f) Ensure that the conservatee’s basic needs for physical health, food, clothing, and shelter are met.

(g) Provide for the proper management and protection of the conservatee’s real and personal property.

(h) Ensure, to the greatest possible extent, that the conservatee is able to understand, make, and communicate their own,
 informed, choices while under conservatorship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 4.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1800.3.

(a) If the need therefor is established to the satisfaction of the court and the other requirements of this chapter are satisfied, the court may appoint:

(1) A conservator of the person or estate of an adult, or both.

(2) A conservator of the person of a minor who is married or whose marriage has been dissolved.

(b) A conservatorship of the person or of the estate shall not be granted by the court unless the court makes an express finding that the granting of the conservatorship is the least restrictive alternative needed for the protection of the conservatee.

(c) In determining whether a conservatorship is the least restrictive alternative available, and whether to grant or deny a conservatorship petition, the court shall consider the person’s abilities and capacities with current and possible supports, including, but not limited to, supported decisionmaking agreements, as defined in Section 21001 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, powers of attorney, designation of a health care surrogate as set forth in Section 4711, and advance health care directives.

(d) If the court becomes aware that the proposed conservatee has a developmental disability, and the proposed conservator is not seeking authority to act under Section 2356.5, the court shall deem the proceeding to be seeking a limited conservatorship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 5.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1801.

Subject to Section 1800.3:

(a) A conservator of the person may be appointed for a person who is unable to provide properly for his or her personal needs for physical health, food, clothing, or shelter, except as provided for the person as described in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 1828.5.

(b) A conservator of the estate may be appointed for a person who is substantially unable to manage his or her own financial resources or resist fraud or undue influence, except as provided for that person as described in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 1828.5. Substantial inability may not be proved solely by isolated incidents of negligence or improvidence.

(c) A conservator of the person and estate may be appointed for a person described in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) A limited conservator of the person or of the estate, or both, may be appointed for a developmentally disabled adult. A limited conservatorship may be utilized only as necessary to promote and protect the well-being of the individual, shall be designed to encourage the development of maximum self-reliance and independence of the individual, and shall be ordered only to the extent necessitated by the individual’s proven mental and adaptive limitations. The conservatee of the limited conservator shall not be presumed to be incompetent and shall retain all legal and civil rights except those which by court order have been designated as legal disabilities and have been specifically granted to the limited conservator. The intent of the Legislature, as expressed in Section 4501 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, that developmentally disabled citizens of this state receive services resulting in more independent, productive, and normal lives is the underlying mandate of this division in its application to adults alleged to be developmentally disabled.

(e) The standard of proof for the appointment of a conservator pursuant to this section shall be clear and convincing evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 842, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.

Subject to Section 1800.3, a conservator of the person or estate, or both, may be appointed for a person who voluntarily requests the appointment and who, to the satisfaction of the court, establishes good cause for the appointment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1803.

A conservator of the estate may be appointed for a person who is an absentee as defined in Section 1403.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1804.

Subject to Section 1800.3, a conservator of the estate may be appointed for a person who is missing and whose whereabouts is unknown.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Order of Preference for Appointment of Conservator [1810. - 1813.1.]

1810.

If the proposed conservatee has sufficient capacity at the time to form an intelligent preference, the proposed conservatee may nominate a conservator in the petition or in a writing signed either before or after the petition is filed. The court shall appoint the nominee as conservator unless the court finds that the appointment of the nominee is not in the best interests of the proposed conservatee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1811.

(a) Subject to Sections 1813 and 1813.1, the spouse, domestic partner, or an adult child, parent, brother, or sister of the proposed conservatee may nominate a conservator in the petition or at the hearing on the petition.

(b) Subject to Sections 1813 and 1813.1, the spouse, domestic partner, or a parent of the proposed conservatee may nominate a conservator in a writing signed either before or after the petition is filed and that nomination remains effective notwithstanding the subsequent legal incapacity or death of the spouse, domestic partner, or parent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 913, Sec. 28.   (AB 2747)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.

(a) Subject to Sections 1810, 1813, and 1813.1, the selection of a conservator of the person or estate, or both, is solely in the discretion of the court and, in making the selection, the court is to be guided by what appears to be for the best interests of the proposed conservatee.

(b) Subject to Sections 1810, 1813, and 1813.1, of persons equally qualified in the opinion of the court to appointment as conservator of the person or estate or both, preference is to be given in the following order:

(1) The conservatee or proposed conservatee’s stated preference, including preferences expressed by speech, sign language, alternative or augmentative communication, actions, facial expressions, and other
 spoken and nonspoken methods of communication.

(2) The prior conservator’s preference, if known, if the selection of a successor conservator is being made pursuant to the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 2680) of Chapter 9.5 of Part 4 and the prior conservator is a person described in paragraphs (3) to (6), inclusive, unless either of the following apply:

(A) The reason for the appointment of a successor conservator is due to the prior conservator’s removal pursuant to the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 2650) of Chapter 9 of Part 4.

(B) The prior conservator or prior conservator’s preference for a successor conservator has been found criminally, civilly, or administratively liable for abuse, neglect, mistreatment, coercion, or fraud with respect to the conservatee or any elder or
 dependent adult. 

(3) The spouse or domestic partner of the proposed conservatee or the person nominated by the spouse or domestic partner pursuant to Section 1811.

(4) An adult child of the proposed conservatee or the person nominated by the child pursuant to Section 1811.

(5) A parent of the proposed conservatee or the person nominated by the parent pursuant to Section 1811.

(6) A sibling of the proposed conservatee or the person nominated by the brother or sister pursuant to Section 1811.

(7) Any other person or entity eligible for appointment as a conservator under this code or, if there is no person or entity willing to act as a conservator, under the Welfare and Institutions
 Code.

(c) The preference for any nominee for appointment under paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (b) is subordinate to the preference for any other parent, child, or sibling in that class.

(d) For any conservatorship petition filed on or after January 1, 2023, a regional center, as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4620) of Division 4.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or any employee or agent acting on a regional center’s behalf, shall not act as a conservator, but may act as the designee of the Director of Developmental Services, subject to Section 416.19 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 6.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1813.

(a) (1) The spouse of a proposed conservatee may not petition for the appointment of a conservator for a spouse or be appointed as conservator of the person or estate of the proposed conservatee unless the petitioner alleges in the petition for appointment as conservator, and the court finds, that the spouse is not a party to any action or proceeding against the proposed conservatee for legal separation of the parties, dissolution of marriage, or adjudication of nullity of their marriage. However, if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the appointment of the spouse, who is a party to an action or proceeding against the proposed conservatee for legal separation of the parties, dissolution of marriage, or
 adjudication of nullity of their marriage, or has obtained a judgment in any of these proceedings, is in the best interests of the proposed conservatee, the court may appoint the spouse.

(2) Prior to making this appointment, the court shall appoint counsel to consult with and advise the conservatee, and to report to the court his or her findings concerning the suitability of appointing the spouse as conservator.

(b) The spouse of a conservatee shall disclose to the conservator, or if the spouse is the conservator, shall disclose to the court, the filing of any action or proceeding against the conservatee for legal separation of the parties, dissolution of marriage, or adjudication of nullity of the marriage, within 10 days of the filing of the action or proceeding by filing a notice with the court and serving the notice according to the notice procedures under this title. The
 court may, upon receipt of the notice, set the matter for hearing on an order to show cause why the appointment of the spouse as conservator, if the spouse is the conservator, should not be terminated and a new conservator appointed by the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 913, Sec. 30.   (AB 2747)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1813.1.

(a) (1) The domestic partner of a proposed conservatee may not petition for the appointment of a conservator for a domestic partner or be appointed as conservator of the person or estate of the proposed conservatee unless the petitioner alleges in the petition for appointment as conservator, and the court finds, that the domestic partner has not terminated and is not intending to terminate the domestic partnership as provided in Section 299 of the Family Code. However, if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the appointment of a domestic partner who has terminated or is intending to terminate the domestic partnership is in the best interests of the proposed conservatee, the court may appoint the domestic partner.

(2) Prior to making this appointment, the court shall appoint counsel to consult with and advise the conservatee, and to report to the court his or her findings concerning the suitability of appointing the domestic partner as conservator.

(b) The domestic partner of a conservatee shall disclose to the conservator, or if the domestic partner is the conservator, shall notify the court, of the termination of a domestic partnership as provided in Section 299 of the Family Code within 10 days of its occurrence. The court may, upon receipt of the notice, set the matter for hearing on an order to show cause why the appointment of the domestic partner as conservator, if the domestic partner is the conservator, should not be terminated and a new conservator appointed by the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 16.5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Establishment of Conservatorship [1820. - 1836.]

1820.

(a) A petition for the appointment of a conservator may be filed by any of the following:

(1) The proposed conservatee.

(2) The spouse or domestic partner of the proposed conservatee.

(3) A relative of the proposed conservatee.

(4) Any interested state or local entity or agency of this state or any interested public officer or employee of this state or of a local public entity of this state.

(5) Any other interested person or friend of the proposed conservatee.

(b) If the proposed conservatee is a minor, the petition may be filed during his or her minority so that the appointment of a conservator may be made effective immediately upon the minor’s attaining the age of majority. An existing guardian of the minor may be appointed as conservator under this part upon the minor’s attaining the age of majority, whether or not the guardian’s accounts have been settled.

(c) A creditor of the proposed conservatee may not file a petition for appointment of a conservator unless the creditor is a person described in paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1821.

(a) (1) The petition shall request that a conservator be appointed for the person or estate, or both, shall specify the name, address, and telephone number of the proposed conservator and the name, address, and telephone number of the proposed conservatee, and state the reasons why a conservatorship is necessary. Unless the petitioner or proposed conservator is a bank or other entity authorized to conduct the business of a trust company, the petitioner or proposed conservator shall also file supplemental information as to why the appointment of a conservator is required. The supplemental information to be submitted shall include a brief statement of facts addressed to each of the following categories:

(A) The inability of the proposed
 conservatee to properly provide for their own needs for physical health, food, clothing, or shelter.

(B) The location and nature of the proposed conservatee’s residence and the ability of the proposed conservatee to live in the residence while under conservatorship.

(C) Alternatives to conservatorship considered by the petitioner or proposed conservator and reasons why those alternatives are not suitable, alternatives tried by the petitioner or proposed conservators, if any, including details as to the length and duration of attempted alternatives and the reasons why those alternatives do not meet the conservatee’s needs. Those alternatives include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Supported decisionmaking agreements, as defined in Section 21001 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(ii) Powers of Attorney set forth in Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4000).

(iii) Advanced Health Care Directives set forth in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 4670) of Part 2 of Division 4.7.

(iv) Designations of a health care surrogate as set forth in Section 4711.

(D) Health or social services provided to the proposed conservatee during the year immediately preceding the filing of the petition, when the petitioner or proposed conservator has information as to those services.

(E) The substantial inability of the proposed conservatee to manage their own financial resources, or to resist fraud or undue influence.

(2) The
 facts required to address the categories set forth in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (1) shall be set forth by the petitioner or proposed conservator if the proposed conservator has knowledge of the facts or by the declarations or affidavits of other persons having knowledge of those facts.

(3) If any of the categories set forth in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (1) are not applicable to the proposed conservatorship, the petitioner or proposed conservator shall so indicate and state on the supplemental information form the reasons therefor.

(4) The Judicial Council shall develop a supplemental information form for the information required pursuant to subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (1) after consultation with individuals or organizations approved by the Judicial Council, who represent public conservators, court investigators,
 the State Bar, specialists with experience in performing assessments and coordinating community-based services, and legal services for the elderly and disabled.

(5) The supplemental information form shall be separate and distinct from the form for the petition. The supplemental information shall be confidential and shall be made available only to parties, persons given notice of the petition who have requested this supplemental information or who have appeared in the proceedings, their attorneys, and the court. The court shall have discretion at any other time to release the supplemental information to other persons if it would serve the interests of the conservatee. The clerk of the court shall make provision for limiting disclosure of the supplemental information exclusively to persons entitled thereto under this section.

(b) The petition shall set forth, so far as they are
 known to the petitioner or proposed conservator, the names and addresses of the spouse or domestic partner, and of the relatives of the proposed conservatee within the second degree. If no spouse or domestic partner of the proposed conservatee or relatives of the proposed conservatee within the second degree are known to the petitioner or proposed conservator, the petition shall set forth, so far as they are known to the petitioner or proposed conservator, the names and addresses of the following persons who, for the purposes of Section 1822, shall all be deemed to be relatives:

(1) A spouse or domestic partner of a predeceased parent of a proposed conservatee.

(2) The children of a predeceased spouse or domestic partner of a proposed conservatee.

(3) The siblings of the proposed conservatee’s parents, if any, but if
 none, then the natural and adoptive children of the proposed conservatee’s parents’ siblings.

(4) The natural and adoptive children of the proposed conservatee’s siblings.

(c) If the petitioner or proposed conservator is a professional fiduciary, as described in Section 2340, who is required to be licensed under the Professional Fiduciaries Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code), the petition shall include the following:

(1) The petitioner’s or proposed conservator’s proposed hourly fee schedule or another statement of their proposed compensation from the estate of the proposed conservatee for services performed as a conservator. The petitioner’s or proposed conservator’s provision of a proposed hourly fee schedule or another statement of their proposed
 compensation, as required by this paragraph, shall not preclude a court from later reducing the petitioner’s or proposed conservator’s fees or other compensation.

(2) Unless a petition for appointment of a temporary conservator that contains the statements required by this paragraph is filed together with a petition for appointment of a conservator, both of the following:

(A) A statement of the petitioner’s or proposed conservator’s license information.

(B) A statement explaining who engaged the petitioner or proposed conservator or how the petitioner or proposed conservator was engaged to file the petition for appointment of a conservator or to agree to accept the appointment as conservator and what prior relationship the petitioner or proposed conservator had with the proposed conservatee or the proposed
 conservatee’s family or friends.

(d) If the petition is filed by a person other than the proposed conservatee, the petition shall include a declaration of due diligence showing both of the following:

(1) Either the efforts to find the proposed conservatee’s relatives or why it was not feasible to contact any of them.

(2) Either the preferences of the proposed conservatee concerning the appointment of a conservator and the appointment of the proposed conservator or why it was not feasible to ascertain those preferences.

(e) If the petition is filed by a person other than the proposed conservatee, the petition shall state whether or not the petitioner is a creditor or debtor, or the agent of a creditor or debtor, of the proposed conservatee.

(f) If the proposed conservatee is a patient in, or on leave of absence from, a state institution under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services and that fact is known to the petitioner or proposed conservator, the petition shall state that fact and name the institution.

(g) The petition shall state, so far as is known to the petitioner or proposed conservator, whether or not the proposed conservatee is receiving, or is entitled to receive, benefits from the Veterans Administration and the estimated amount of the monthly benefit payable by the Veterans Administration for the proposed conservatee.

(h) The petition may include an application for any order or orders authorized under this division, including, but not limited to, orders under Chapter 4
 (commencing with Section 1870).

(i) The petition may include a further statement that the proposed conservatee is not willing to attend the hearing on the petition, does not wish to contest the establishment of the conservatorship, and does not object to the proposed conservator or prefer that another person act as conservator.

(j) (1) In the case of an allegedly developmentally disabled adult, the petition shall set forth the following:

(A) The nature and degree of the alleged disability, the specific duties and powers requested by or for the limited conservator, and the limitations of civil and legal rights requested to be included in the court’s order of appointment.

(B) Whether or not the proposed limited conservatee is, or is
 alleged to be, developmentally disabled.

(2) Reports submitted pursuant to Section 416.8 of the Health and Safety Code meet the requirements of this section, and conservatorships filed pursuant to Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 416) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Health and Safety Code are exempt from providing the supplemental information required by this section, as long as the guidelines adopted by the State Department of Developmental Services for regional centers are publicly accessible via the department’s internet website and require the same information that is required pursuant to this section.

(k) The petition shall state, so far as is known to the petitioner, whether or not the proposed conservatee is a member of a federally recognized Indian tribe. If so, the petition shall state the name of the tribe, the state in which the tribe is located, whether
 the proposed conservatee resides on tribal land, and whether the proposed conservatee is known to own property on tribal land. For the purposes of this subdivision, “tribal land” means land that is, with respect to a specific Indian tribe and the members of that tribe, “Indian country” as defined in Section 1151 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 7.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1822.

(a) At least 15 days before the hearing on the petition for appointment of a conservator, notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given as provided in this section. The notice shall be accompanied by a copy of the petition. The court shall not shorten the time for giving the notice of hearing under this section.

(b) Notice shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to the following persons:

(1) The spouse, if any, or registered domestic partner, if any, of the proposed conservatee at the address stated in the petition.

(2) The relatives named in the
 petition at their addresses stated in the petition.

(c) If notice is required by Section 1461 to be given to the Director of State Hospitals or the Director of Developmental Services, notice shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 as required.

(d) If the petition states that the proposed conservatee is receiving or is entitled to receive benefits from the Veterans Administration, notice shall be mailed to the Office of the Veterans Administration referred to in Section 1461.5.

(e) If the proposed conservatee is a person with developmental disabilities, at least 30 days before the day of the hearing on the petition, the petitioner shall deliver pursuant to Section 1215 a notice of the hearing and a copy of the
 petition to the regional center identified in Section 1827.5.

(f) If the petition states that the petitioner and the proposed conservator have no prior relationship with the proposed conservatee and are not nominated by a family member, friend, or other person with a relationship to the proposed conservatee, notice shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to the public guardian of the county in which the petition is filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 34.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1823.

(a) If the petition is filed by a person other than the proposed conservatee, the clerk shall issue a citation directed to the proposed conservatee setting forth the time and place of hearing.

(b) The citation shall state the legal standards by which the need for a conservatorship is adjudged as stated in Section 1801 and shall state the substance of all of the following:

(1) The proposed conservatee may be adjudged unable to provide for personal needs or to manage financial resources and, by reason thereof, a conservator may be appointed for the person or estate, or both.

(2) Such adjudication may affect or transfer to the conservator the proposed conservatee’s right to contract, in whole or in part, to manage and control property, to give informed consent for medical treatment, and to fix a residence.

(3) (A) The proposed conservatee may be disqualified from voting pursuant to Section 2208 of the Elections Code if the proposed conservatee is incapable of communicating, with or without reasonable accommodations, a desire to participate in the voting process.

(B) The proposed conservatee shall not be disqualified from voting on the basis that the proposed conservatee does, or would need to do, any of the following to complete an affidavit of voter registration:

(i) Signs the affidavit of voter registration with a mark or a cross pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2150 of the Elections Code.

(ii) Signs the affidavit of voter registration by means of a signature stamp pursuant to Section 354.5 of the Elections Code.

(iii) Completes the affidavit of voter registration with the assistance of another person pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2150 of the Elections Code.

(iv) Completes the affidavit of voter registration with reasonable accommodations.

(4) The court or a court investigator shall explain the nature, purpose, and effect of the proceeding to the proposed conservatee and shall answer questions
 concerning the explanation.

(5) The proposed conservatee has the right to appear at the hearing and to oppose the petition, and in the case of an alleged developmentally disabled adult, to oppose the petition in part, by objecting to any or all of the requested duties or powers of the limited conservator.

(6) The proposed conservatee has the right to choose and be represented by legal counsel and has the right to have legal counsel appointed by the court if not otherwise represented by legal counsel.

(7) The proposed conservatee has the right to a jury trial, if desired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 420, Sec. 34.   (AB 2960)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1824.

The citation and a copy of the petition shall be served on the proposed conservatee at least 15 days before the hearing. Service shall be made in the manner provided in Section 415.10 or 415.30 of the Code of Civil Procedure or in such manner as may be authorized by the court. If the proposed conservatee is outside this state, service may also be made in the manner provided in Section 415.40 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1825.

(a) The proposed conservatee shall be produced at the hearing except in the following cases:

(1) Where the proposed conservatee is out of the state when served and is not the petitioner.

(2) Where the proposed conservatee is unable to attend the hearing by reason of medical inability.

(3) Where the court investigator has reported to the court that the proposed conservatee has expressly communicated that the proposed conservatee (i) is not willing to attend the hearing, (ii) does not wish to contest the establishment of the conservatorship, and (iii) does not object to the proposed conservator or prefer that another person act as conservator, and the court makes an order that the proposed conservatee need not attend the hearing.

(b) If the proposed conservatee is unable to attend the hearing because of medical inability, such inability shall be established (1) by the affidavit or certificate of a licensed medical practitioner or (2) if the proposed conservatee is an adherent of a religion whose tenets and practices call for reliance on prayer alone for healing and is under treatment by an accredited practitioner of that religion, by the affidavit of the practitioner. The affidavit or certificate is evidence only of the proposed conservatee’s inability to attend the hearing and shall not be considered in determining the issue of need for the establishment of a conservatorship.

(c) Emotional or psychological instability is not good cause for the absence of the proposed conservatee from the hearing unless, by reason of such instability, attendance at the hearing is likely to cause serious and immediate physiological damage to the proposed conservatee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1826.

(a) Regardless of whether the proposed conservatee attends the hearing, the court investigator shall do all of the following:

(1) Conduct the following interviews:

(A) The proposed conservatee personally.

(B) All petitioners and all proposed conservators who are not petitioners.

(C) The proposed conservatee’s spouse or registered domestic partner and relatives within the first degree. If the proposed conservatee does not have a spouse, registered domestic partner, or relatives within the first
 degree, to the greatest extent possible, the proposed conservatee’s relatives within the second degree.

(D) To the greatest extent practical and taking into account the proposed conservatee’s wishes, the proposed conservatee’s relatives within the second degree not required to be interviewed under subparagraph (C), neighbors, and, if known, close friends.

(2) Inform the proposed conservatee of the contents of the petition and citation, of the nature, purpose, and effect of the proceeding, and of the right of the proposed conservatee to oppose the petition, to attend the hearing on the petition, to have the matter of the establishment of the conservatorship tried by jury, to be represented by legal counsel, and to have legal counsel appointed by the court if not otherwise represented by
 legal counsel.

(3) Determine if it appears that the proposed conservatee is unable to attend the hearing and, if able to attend, whether the proposed conservatee is willing to attend the hearing.

(4) Review the allegations of the petition as to why the appointment of the conservator is required and, in making the determination, do the following:

(A) Refer to the supplemental information form submitted by the petitioner and consider the facts set forth in the form that address each of the categories specified in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1821, as well as the medical reports received pursuant to paragraph (9).
